spell/en-strict.aff
# Reference: https://cgit.freedesktop.org/libreoffice/dictionaries/tree/en/en_US.aff
# 2024-01-29 (Marco A.G.Pinto)
# - Fix: apostrophe handling, by adding: WORDCHARS 0123456789’ to the .aff.
#

SET UTF-8
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwzESIANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWZ'
ICONV 1
ICONV ’ '
NOSUGGEST !

# ordinal numbers
COMPOUNDMIN 1
# only in compounds: 1th, 2th, 3th
ONLYINCOMPOUND c
# compound rules:
# 1. [0-9]*1[0-9]th (10th, 11th, 12th, 56714th, etc.)
# 2. [0-9]*[02-9](1st|2nd|3rd|[4-9]th) (21st, 22nd, 123rd, 1234th, etc.)
COMPOUNDRULE 2
COMPOUNDRULE n*1t
COMPOUNDRULE n*mp
WORDCHARS 0123456789’

PFX A Y 1
PFX A   0     re         .

PFX I Y 1
PFX I   0     in         .

PFX U Y 1
PFX U   0     un         .

PFX C Y 1
PFX C   0     de          .

PFX O Y 1
PFX O   0     en          .

PFX Q Y 1
PFX Q   0     ex          .

PFX E Y 1
PFX E   0     dis         .

PFX F Y 1
PFX F   0     con         .

PFX K Y 1
PFX K   0     pro         .

SFX V N 2
SFX V   e     ive        e
SFX V   0     ive        [^e]

SFX N Y 3
SFX N   e     ion        e
SFX N   y     ication    y
SFX N   0     en         [^ey]

SFX X Y 3
SFX X   e     ions       e
SFX X   y     ications   y
SFX X   0     ens        [^ey]

SFX H N 2
SFX H   y     ieth       y
SFX H   0     th         [^y]

SFX Y Y 1
SFX Y   0     ly         .

SFX G Y 2
SFX G   e     ing        e
SFX G   0     ing        [^e]

SFX J Y 2
SFX J   e     ings       e
SFX J   0     ings       [^e]

SFX D Y 5
SFX D   0     d          e
SFX D   0     ged        g
SFX D   y     ied        [^aeiou]y
SFX D   0     ed         [^ey]
SFX D   0     ed         [aeiou]y

SFX T N 4
SFX T   0     st         e
SFX T   y     iest       [^aeiou]y
SFX T   0     est        [aeiou]y
SFX T   0     est        [^ey]

SFX R Y 4
SFX R   0     r          e
SFX R   y     ier        [^aeiou]y
SFX R   0     er         [aeiou]y
SFX R   0     er         [^ey]

SFX Z Y 4
SFX Z   0     rs         e
SFX Z   y     iers       [^aeiou]y
SFX Z   0     ers        [aeiou]y
SFX Z   0     ers        [^ey]

SFX S Y 4
SFX S   y     ies        [^aeiou]y
SFX S   0     s          [aeiou]y
SFX S   0     es         [sxzh]
SFX S   0     s          [^sxzhy]

SFX P Y 3
SFX P   y     iness      [^aeiou]y
SFX P   0     ness       [aeiou]y
SFX P   0     ness       [^y]

SFX M Y 1
SFX M   0     's         .

SFX B Y 3
SFX B   0     able       [^aeiou]
SFX B   0     able       ee
SFX B   e     able       [^aeiou]e

SFX L Y 1
SFX L   0     ment       .

SFX 1 Y 1
SFX 1   0     'll         .

SFX 2 Y 1
SFX 2   0     'd         .

PFX 3 Y 1
PFX 3   0     re-         .
