spell/en-strict.dic
act/ASDGV
agree/EBLDS
allow/EGDS
answer/BMDGS
appear/AESDG
arm/EAGDS
arrange/AESDLG
ball/SGMD
band/ESGD
bank/SZGBMDR
bar/ECUTS
base/CDSLTG
bear/SZGBJMR
beat/SZGBMNRJ
believe/EDRSZG
best/SGMD
better/MDGLS
bird/SZGMDR
bit/CSMG
black/PXTGMDNRYS
block/UGDS
blow/SZGMR
board/ZGMDRS
bone/DRSMZG
book/SBJGMD
born/IAU
box/ZGMDNRS
branch/GMDS
bread/GMDHS
break/BMZGRS
bright/SPNRYXT
broad/SMNRYXTP
broken/YP
brown/SMDRPTG
burn/MDRZGSB
busy/DRSTGP
but/ACS
buy/ZGSMR
camp/CSGD
card/ESGMD
care/SM
case/LDSJMG
catch/ZGJLMRS
caught/U
certain/UY
change/MZGDRS
charge/AESDGM
chart/GMDS
check/AGMDS
chick/XMNS
chief/TMRYS
choose/ZGRS
claim/CKEAGDS
clean/BJPZTGDRYS
clear/JPTGMDRYS
clock/SMDG
close/DRSMYTGJP
clothe/UDSG
cold/MRYTPS
collect/ASGVD
color/AEGDS
come/IMZGRS
common/UPRYT
compare/BDSG
complete/PYTGNXDRS
condition/AGSD
connect/AEDVGS
contain/SBLDRZG
continue/EGDS
control/CS
cook/ADGS
cool/MDRYZTGPS
copy/ADSG
corn/MDRZGS
correct/DRYTGVSBP
cost/MDYGSJ
count/EASMDG
course/EDGMS
cover/AEUGDS
crease/ICOGMSD
create/KADSGNV
cross/AUGTSD
cry/ZGJDRSM
current/FAY
cut/TSMR
dark/PXTMNRY
dead/XTMNRY
deal/SJZGMR
dear/SPTMRYH
deep/SPXTMNRY
degree/MS
describe/BZGDR
desert/SDRZGM
develop/ASGDL
did/AU
differ/DG
direct/ASDGVTY
divide/DRSMZGB
do/SJMRHZG
does/AU
done/FAU
door/IS
draw/MRZGSJ
dress/AUGSDM
drink/SMRBJZG
dry/ZTGDRSMY
early/RTP
earth/UDYG
eat/ZGBSNR
edge/MZGJDRS
effect/SMDGV
element/MS
end/GVSJMD
equal/SMDYG
equate/DSGNBX
even/MDRYTGSJP
except/GSD
excite/BDRSLZG
experience/IMD
face/ACSDG
fair/MRYTGJPS
fall/MNGS
famous/IY
fast/MDRTGSP
father/SGMDY
favor/ESMDG
feed/MRZGSJ
fell/MDRZTGS
felt/MDGS
field/ISMRZ
fig/SLM
figure/FEGSD
fill/AIDGS
fine/CAFTGDS
fish/MDRSZG
fit/KAMS
flower/CSDG
fly/ZTGBDRSM
follow/SDRZGJ
foot/MDRZGSJ
for/H
forest/ACGDS
form/CAIFDGS
forward/MDRYZTGSP
found/FSDG
four/MHS
fraction/ISM
fresh/PNRYXZT
friend/UGSDY
front/FSDG
game/MYTGDRSP
gas/CS
gather/SJZGMDR
gentle/TGDRSP
go/JMRHZG
gold/MNS
gone/ZR
govern/DGSBL
grand/SMRYPT
gray/MDRTGSP
great/SMRYPT
green/GPSMDRYT
group/JSZGMDR
grow/AHSG
guess/ZGBMDRS
hand/UDGS
happy/URTP
hard/NRYXTP
hat/ZGSMDR
head/MDRZGJS
hear/AHGJS
heard/AU
heavy/RSMTP
high/MRYZTP
house/ADSG
huge/YP
hundred/SMH
hunt/MDRSZG
ice/CDSG
imagine/DSBJG
indicate/XDSGNV
industry/SM
instant/MRYS
interest/ESMD
invent/ASGVD
it/USM
join/AFDSG
kind/UPRYT
know/SB
land/MDRSGJ
large/RSPMYT
late/YTRP
laugh/BMDG
lay/AICSGM
lead/MDNRSZG
learn/AUGDS
length/MNX
less/MNRX
let/ISM
letter/ZGMDRS
level/PSZGMDRY
life/MZR
light/CASTGD
line/MZGDRSJ
list/MDNSJXG
listen/BMDRZG
locate/EAGNDS
lone/YZR
long/KDSTG
look/MDRSZG
loud/RYTP
love/MYZGDRSB
make/UAGS
man/USY
mark/AMDSG
market/MDRZGBS
mass/MDSGV
me/DSH
meant/U
measure/ADSG
metal/SMD
middle/MGS
million/HSM
mind/ADRSZG
mine/MZGNDRSX
minute/PDRSMYTG
miss/EDSGV
mix/ZGMDRSB
modern/MYPS
motion/KCM
mount/EASGMD
move/AMZGDRSB
multiply/NZGDRSX
natural/UPY
necessary/SM
need/MDSG
neighbor/SMDYG
night/SMY
nose/MGDS
note/FCSDG
nothing/PSM
noun/KMS
number/ASDG
object/SGVMD
off/SZGDRJ
old/TMNRP
one/SXMNP
open/ZTGJPMDRYS
operate/DSGNVX
opposite/SMYNX
original/MYS
other/MSP
out/SJGMDR
own/ESGD
oxygen/M
paint/SZGJMDR
pair/AMDSG
past/AMS
pay/ASGBL
person/UMS
pitch/MDRSZG
place/AESDLG
plane/CGDS
play/AEGMDS
point/MDRSZG
port/CAEGDS
pose/CAKEGDS
position/CKEMS
post/ZGMDRSJ
pound/KDSG
practice/DSMGB
present/LMDRYZGSB
press/ACGSD
pretty/TGDRSMP
produce/AZGDRS
protect/GVSD
prove/EAGDS
put/ISM
question/SMDRZGBJ
quick/MNRYXTP
quiet/SMDNRYXTGP
race/MZGDRS
rail/CGDS
raise/MZGDRS
reach/MDSGB
ready/DRSTGP
reason/SMDRZGB
red/PSM
repeat/SMDRZGB
require/LDG
rest/GVMDS
ring/ZGMDRJ
rise/JMZGRS
road/IMS
roll/MDRZGJS
round/PSMDRYZTG
rule/MZGJDRS
safe/MYTPRS
salt/CTGDS
say/USG
school/SGMD
science/FMS
season/SGMDBJ
second/SLZGMDRY
section/AESM
seem/GDS
select/CSGVD
send/ZGRS
sent/FAU
sentence/MGDS
separate/XMYGNVDSP
serve/FACGDS
set/AISM
settle/AUGDS
seven/MHS
several/MY
shape/AGDS
sharp/MDNRYSPXZTG
ship/ALS
short/XTGMDNRYSP
shout/ZGMDRS
side/AGDSI
sign/AFCGDS
simple/TRP
single/PMGDS
six/MSH
size/AGDS
slow/DRYTGSP
small/SMRTP
smile/DSMG
soft/NRYXTP
soldier/MDYSG
sound/JPSMDRYZTG
speak/SRZGJ
spell/JSMDRZG
spend/BSRZG
spot/CMS
square/PDRSMYTG
stand/SMRJZG
star/MDRZGS
state/DRSMYGNLX
step/IMS
stick/SMRZG
still/ITGSD
stop/US
story/DSM
straight/SPXTMNRY
stream/MDRSZG
stretch/BZGMDRS
strong/RYT
study/AGDS
subject/GVMDS
success/VMS
suggest/GVSDR
supply/ZGDRSMXN
support/MDRSBZGV
table/MGDS
tail/ACSDMG
take/AIMS
tall/TRP
teach/ZGRSBJ
tell/AGS
ten/BMH
test/AKFCDGS
thick/PMNRYXT
thing/M
thousand/MHS
time/MYZGJDRS
tiny/RTP
to/IU
together/P
tone/IZGDRS
total/GSMDY
train/ZGSMDRB
travel/MDRSZGJ
try/AGDS
turn/AMDRSZG
twenty/SMH
use/AEDSMG
usual/UY
verb/KMS
view/AMDRSZG
voice/IDSMG
walk/MDRZGS
wall/MDGS
warm/PDRYHZTGS
wave/MZGDRS
wear/MRBJSZG
whole/SMP
wild/MRYSTP
winter/GSMD
wire/AGDS
woman/M
wonder/MDGLS
wood/MDNSG
work/ADJSG
written/AU
wrong/STGMPDRY
yellow/MDRTGPS
you/SMH
able/UT
accept/DSBG
act/ASDGV
add/SDRBZG
agree/EBLDS
allow/EGDS
answer/BMDGS
appear/AESDG
apply/ANXGDS3
available/U
ball/SGMD
base/CDSLTG
believe/EDRSZG
best/SGMD
better/MDGLS
bring/SRZG
but/ACS
case/LDSJMG
catch/ZGJLMRS
change/MZGDRS
choice/MTRS
claim/CKEAGDS
class/GMDS
clear/JPTGMDRYS
come/IMZGRS
comment/GSMD
common/UPRYT
compare/BDSG
continue/EGDS
control/CS
cost/MDYGSJ
couple/UCGSD
cover/AEUGDS
create/KADSGNV
current/FAY
dark/PXTMNRY
date/DRSMZGV
decision/IM
develop/ASGDL
difference/IM
different/IY
discussion/SM
do/SJMRHZG
door/IS
down/MDRZGS
drive/RSMZGJ
early/RTP
easy/URTP
effect/SMDGV
end/GVSJMD
enjoy/GBLSD
enter/ASGD
everything/M
experience/IMD
factor/ASDG
fall/MNGS
feeling/MY
few/TPMR
field/ISMRZ
figure/FEGSD
fill/AIDGS
find/JMRZGS
fine/CAFTGDS
five/MZRS
for/H
form/CAIFDGS
former/FIAM
forward/MDRYZTGSP
four/MHS
full/MDRZTGSP
give/ZGJRS
go/JMRHZG
great/SMRYPT
ground/ZGMDRJS
group/JSZGMDR
grow/AHSG
guess/ZGBMDRS
hand/UDGS
happen/SDGJ
happy/URTP
hard/NRYXTP
hate/MS
hear/AHGJS
high/MRYZTP
hold/MRJSZG
huge/YP
identify/ZGNDRSX
interest/ESMD
interesting/Y
involve/LDSG
it/USM
join/AFDSG
keep/MRSZG
language/MS
last/MDYSG
lay/AICSGM
learn/AUGDS
leave/DRSMZGJ
less/MNRX
let/ISM
level/PSZGMDRY
light/CASTGD
line/MZGDRSJ
list/MDNSJXG
listen/BMDRZG
live/ATGDSB
long/KDSTG
lose/ZGRSJ
main/MYS
make/UAGS
manage/ZGDRSL
mean/MRYJPSTG
meeting/M
member/EAS
minute/PDRSMYTG
miss/EDSGV
model/ZGSJMDR
near/DRYSPTG
new/STMRYP
nice/PYTR
not/B
note/FCSDG
occur/AS
off/SZGDRJ
offer/JGMD
often/TR
oh/M
old/TMNRP
one/SXMNP
open/ZTGJPMDRYS
order/EAMDGS
physical/MYS
pick/MDRSJZG
place/AESDLG
plant/MDRZGSJ
play/AEGMDS
please/EDSG
poor/TRYP
position/CKEMS
prepare/GDS
present/LMDRYZGSB
pretty/TGDRSMP
price/AGDS
private/XMYTNRS
program/CAS
protect/GVSD
prove/EAGDS
pull/ZGMDRS
push/ZGMDRS
put/ISM
rate/JXMZGNDRS
reach/MDSGB
read/ZGMRBJS
real/TMRYPS
red/PSM
relationship/MS
require/LDG
rest/GVMDS
rise/JMZGRS
rock/ZGMDRS
rule/MZGJDRS
safe/MYTPRS
save/BJMZGDRS
say/USG
second/SLZGMDRY
serve/FACGDS
service/EMS
set/AISM
seven/MHS
shoot/ZGMRSJ
short/XTGMDNRYSP
side/AGDS
sign/AFCGDS
site/MGDS
six/MSH
sorry/RTP
sort/FASGDM
sound/JPSMDRYZTG
spend/BSRZG
stand/SMRJZG
state/DRSMYGNLX
still/ITGSD
strong/RYT
study/AGDS
subject/GVMDS
success/VMS
suggest/GVSDR
summer/MDSG
support/MDRSBZGV
table/MGDS
teach/ZGRSBJ
ten/BMH
test/AKFCDGS
throw/SMRZG
time/MYZGJDRS
to/IU
use/AEDSMG
version/AFIMS
view/AMDRSZG
wall/MDGS
watch/BZGMDRS
we/12
well/MDPSG
wonder/MDGLS
word/ADSG
year/MYS
you/SMH
attribute/DSMGNVBX
child/M
code/COZGDRS
color/AEGDS
command/SMDRLZG
disable/DSGL
import/ZGBSMDR
inherit/EGSD
iteration/AM
library/SM
patch/EGMDS
raw/PTMR
save/BJMZGDRS
script/FSMDG
select/CSGVD
terminal/MYS
valid/IGMDYS
variable/ISM
version/AFIMS
visibility/IM
clusive/QI
do/SJMRHZG
setting/S
background/MRZS
execution/ZMR
filter/MDRBSZG
frame/DRSMZG
hack/DS
major/SGMDY
patch/EGMDS
plug/US
assert/AGVDS
for/H
in/ASM
lambda/SM
not/B
yield/JSGMD
apply/ANXGDS
coerce/DRSZGNV
compile/DRSZG
enumerate/DSGNX
file/CAKGDS
filter/MDRBSZG
format/SMV
format/SMV
help/MDRZGSJ
intern/GDL
license/MGDS
list/MDNSJXG
long/KDSTG
object/SGVMD
open/ZTGJPMDRYS
set/AISM
slice/DRSMZG
sorted/U
false/PRYT
